District of Columbia statutes.
28:2A-510

Installment lease contracts: rejection and default.

(a)

Under an installment lease contract a lessee may reject any delivery that is nonconforming if the nonconformity substantially impairs the value of that delivery and cannot be cured or the nonconformity is a defect in the required documents; but if the nonconformity does not fall within subsection (b) of this section and the lessor or the supplier gives adequate assurance of its cure, the lessee must accept that delivery.

(b)

Whenever nonconformity or default with respect to one or more deliveries substantially impairs the value of the installment lease contract as a whole, there is a default with respect to the whole. But, the aggrieved party reinstates the installment lease contract as a whole if the aggrieved party accepts a nonconforming delivery without seasonably notifying of cancellation or brings an action with respect only to past deliveries or demands performance as to future deliveries.

July 22, 1992, D.C. Law 9-128, § 2(b), 39 DCR 3830

Uniform Statutory Source:Section 2-612.

Changes: Revised to reflect leasing practices and terminology.

Definitional Cross References: “Action”. Section 1-201(1).

“Aggrieved party”. Section 1-201(2).

“Cancellation”. Section 2A-103(1)(b).

“Conforming”. Section 2A-103(1)(d).

“Delivery”. Section 1-201(14).

“Installment lease contract”. Section 2A-103(1)(i).

“Lessee”. Section 2A-103(1)(n).

“Lessor”. Section 2A-103(1)(p).

“Notifies”. Section 1-201(26).

“Seasonably”. Section 1-204(3).

“Supplier”. Section 2A-103(1)(x).

“Value”. Section 1-201(44).

1981 Ed., § 28:2A-510.
This section is referenced in § 28:2A-406, § 28:2A-508, § 28:2A-509, and § 28:2A-523.